Montana, session 2025, HB822.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Article XIV, section 8, of The Constitution of the State of Montana is amended to read:
"Section 8. Amendment by legislative referendum. Amendments to this constitution may be
proposed by any member of the legislature. If adopted by an affirmative roll call vote of two-thirds of all the
members thereof, whether one or more bodies, the proposed amendment shall be submitted to the qualified
electors at the next general election. If approved by a majority three-fifths of the electors voting thereon, the
amendment shall become a part of this constitution on the first day of July after certification of the election
returns unless the amendment provides otherwise."

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Two-thirds vote required. Because [section 1] is a legislative proposal
to amend the constitution, Article XIV, section 8, of the Montana constitution requires an affirmative roll call vote
of two-thirds of all the members of the legislature, whether one or more bodies, for passage.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Submission to electorate. [This act] shall be submitted to the qualified
electors of Montana at the general election to be held in November 2026 by printing on the ballot the full title of
[this act] and the following:
[] YES on Constitutional Amendment ____.
[] NO on Constitutional Amendment ____.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 822